Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.090

Enforcement—Court order.

If, in the opinion of the director, an agricultural lender violates or there is reasonable cause to believe that an agricultural lender is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, the director may bring an action in the appropriate court to enjoin the violation or to enforce compliance. Upon a proper showing, a restraining order, or preliminary or permanent injunction, shall be granted, and a receiver or a conservator may be appointed for the agricultural lender or the agricultural lender's assets.

[ 1994 c 92 s 258; 1990 c 134 s 9.]